California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(4) “Qualified health care professional” means an individual who has no financial relationship to the provider of complex rehabilitation technology and is any of the following:

(A) A physical therapist licensed pursuant to Chapter 5.7 (commencing with Section 2600) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) An occupational therapist licensed pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 2570) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(C) Other licensed health care professional, approved by the department, and who
 performs specialty evaluations within the professional’s scope of practice.

(5) “Qualified rehabilitation technology professional” means an individual who meets either of the following:

(A) Holds the credential of Assistive Technology Professional (ATP) from the Rehabilitation Engineering and Assistive Technology Society of North America.

(B) Holds the credential of Certified Complex Rehabilitation Technology Supplier (CRTS) from the National Registry of Rehabilitation Technology Suppliers.

(b) A provider of complex rehabilitation technology to a Medi-Cal beneficiary shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Meet the supplier and quality standards established for a durable medical
 equipment supplier under the federal Medicare Program and be enrolled as a provider in the Medi-Cal program.

(2) Be accredited by a recognized accrediting organization as a supplier of complex rehabilitation technology.

(3) Employ at least one qualified rehabilitation technology professional as a W-2 employee (receiving a W-2 tax form from the provider) for each distribution location.

(4) Have the qualified rehabilitation technology professional physically present for the evaluation, either in person or remotely if necessary, directly involved in determining the specific complex rehabilitation technology appropriate for the patient, and directly involved with, or closely supervise, the final fitting and delivery of the complex rehabilitation technology.

(5) Maintain a reasonable supply of parts, adequate physical facilities, and qualified service or repair technicians, and provide patients with prompt services and repair for all complex rehabilitation technology supplied.

(6) Provide written information at the time of delivery of complex rehabilitation technology regarding how the patient may receive services and repair.

(c) For complex needs patients receiving a complex rehabilitation manual wheelchair, power wheelchair, or seating component, the patient shall be evaluated, either in person or remotely if necessary, by both of the following:

(1) A qualified health care professional.

(2) A qualified rehabilitation technology professional.

(d) A medical provider shall conduct a physical examination of an individual, either in person or remotely if necessary, before prescribing a power wheelchair or scooter for a Medi-Cal beneficiary. The medical provider shall complete a certificate of medical necessity that documents the medical condition that necessitates the power wheelchair or scooter, and verifies that the patient is capable of using the wheelchair or scooter safely.

(e) The department may adopt utilization controls, including a specialty evaluation by a qualified health care professional, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a). The department may adopt any other additional utilization controls for complex rehabilitation technology, as appropriate.

(f) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. This section shall be implemented only to
 the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 22.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.86.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (ab) of Section 14132, effective May 1, 2014, purchase of prescribed enteral nutrition products is covered, subject to the Medi-Cal list of enteral nutrition products pursuant to Section 14105.8 and utilization controls pursuant to Section 14105.395.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of a provider bulletin or similar instruction, without taking regulatory action.

(c) This section shall only be implemented to the extent permitted by federal law.

(d) The department shall seek approval for federal financial participation and coverage of the service specified in subdivision (a) under the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 63.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.88.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 14132 and to the extent funds are made available in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the following are covered benefits for beneficiaries 21 years of age or older under this chapter:

(1) One dental prophylaxis cleaning per year.

(2) One initial dental examination by a dentist.

(b) The following are covered benefits for beneficiaries under 21 years of age under this chapter:

(1) Two dental prophylaxis cleanings per year.

(2) Two periodic dental examinations per year.

(c) For persons 21 years of age or older, laboratory-processed crowns on posterior teeth are a covered benefit when medically necessary to restore a posterior tooth back to normal function based on the criteria specified in the Medi-Cal Dental Manual of Criteria.

(d) Any prefabricated crown made from ADA-approved materials may be used on posterior teeth and may be reimbursed as a stainless steel crown.

(e) Covered dental benefits and accompanying criteria for receipt of those dental benefits under the Medi-Cal program shall be identified in the Medi-Cal Dental Manual of Criteria. Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 14132, the department shall evaluate all covered dental benefits, including those listed in this section and in the Medi-Cal Dental
 Manual of Criteria, for evidence-based practices consistent with the American Academy of Pediatric Dentistry and the American Dental Association guidelines.

(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the department shall require pretreatment radiograph documentation on posttreatment claims to establish the medical necessity for dental restorations. The pretreatment documentation required under this subdivision is intended to reduce fraudulent claims for unnecessary dental fillings. In order to avoid any undue barriers to accessing dental care, the department shall stipulate that the pretreatment radiograph documentation for posttreatment claims will be required only when there are four or more dental fillings being completed in any 12-month period.

(2) For any beneficiary who is under four years of age, or who, regardless of age, has a developmental
 disability, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4512, radiographs or photographs that indicate decay on any tooth surface shall be considered sufficient documentation to establish the medical necessity for treatment provided.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins, plan letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(g) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 102.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.89.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 14132, effective May 1, 2014, or the effective date of any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivision (d), all of the following are covered benefits for persons 21 years of age or older, subject to utilization controls and medically necessary services:

(1) Examinations, radiographs/photographic images, prophylaxis, and fluoride treatments.

(2) Amalgam and composite restorations.

(3) Stainless steel, resin, and resin window crowns.

(4) Anterior root
 canal therapy.

(5) Complete dentures, including immediate dentures.

(6) Complete denture adjustments, repairs, and relines.

(7) Emergency procedures are also covered in the above categories of service.

(b) This section shall only be implemented to the extent permitted by federal law.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of a provider bulletin or similar instruction, without taking regulatory action.

(d) The department shall seek approval for federal financial participation and coverage of
 services specified in subdivision (a) under the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 64.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.9.

Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 14132, any utilization controls imposed under such subdivision shall not include mandatory examination by any person not licensed as a dentist under the Dental Practice Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 958.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.905.

(a) Day care habilitative services, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14021, shall be provided only to alcohol- and drug-exposed pregnant women and women in the postpartum period, or as required by federal law.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 106.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Adding action operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.   Section operative July 1, 2013, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.91.

(a) Subject to the availability of funding, the department shall conduct a dental outreach and education program for Medi-Cal beneficiaries. The program shall inform Medi-Cal beneficiaries of the availability of dental care and provide information regarding recommended frequencies for regular and preventive dental care, how to obtain Medi-Cal dental care, how to avoid inappropriate care or fraudulent providers, and how to obtain assistance in getting care or resolving problems with dental care.

(b) The program shall particularly target underserved populations and parents of young and adolescent children, and it shall include the following components:

(1) Incorporation of dental themes and information in ongoing outreach and advertising efforts, including those for Medi-Cal and the Healthy Families program.

(2) Education and outreach materials for inclusion in mailings to beneficiaries.

(3) Education and consumer protection materials for display and distribution at sites providing Medi-Cal dental care, clinics, and other health care facilities and sites.

(c) The department shall consult with dental professional groups and experts, community organizations, advertising and media experts,
 and other parties, as the department deems appropriate, in order to develop and structure the program in an effective and efficient manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 94.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.915.

(a) (1) The department shall establish a list of performance measures to ensure the dental fee-for-service program meets quality and access criteria required by the department. The performance measures shall be designed to evaluate utilization, access, availability, and effectiveness of preventive care and treatment.

(2) Prior to establishing the quality and access criteria described in paragraph (1), the department shall consult with stakeholders, including representatives from counties, local dental societies, nonprofit entities, legal aid entities, and other interested parties.

(3) The performance measures established by the
 department to monitor the dental fee-for-service program for children shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Overall utilization of dental services.

(B) For each provider, all of the following:

(i) Number of annual dental visits.

(ii) Number of annual preventive dental services.

(iii) Number of annual dental treatment services.

(iv) Number of annual examinations and oral health evaluations.

(C) Number of applications of dental sealants and fluoride varnishes.

(D) Continuity
 of care and overall utilization over an extended period of time.

(E) All of the following ratios:

(i) Sealant to restoration.

(ii) Filling to preventive services.

(iii) Treatment to caries prevention.

(F) No sooner than January 1, 2018, number of beneficiaries requiring general anesthesia to perform procedures.

(4) The performance measures established by the department to monitor the dental fee-for-service program for adults shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Overall utilization of dental services.

(B) For each provider, all of the following:

(i) Number of annual dental visits.

(ii) Number of annual preventive dental services.

(iii) Number of annual dental treatment services.

(iv) Number of annual examinations and oral health evaluations. 

(C) Treatment to caries prevention ratio.

(5) The performance measures shall be reported as aggregate numbers and as percentages, if appropriate, using standards that are as equivalent to those used by managed care entities as feasible. Performance measures for the dental fee-for-service program for children shall be
 reported by age groupings if appropriate.

(b) The department shall include the initial list of performance measures in any dental contract entered into between the department and a fee-for-service contractor on or after enactment of this section.

(c) To ensure that the dental health needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries are met, the department shall, when evaluating performance measures for retention on, addition to, or deletion from, the list of performance measures, consider all of the following criteria:

(1) Annual and multiyear Medi-Cal dental fee-for-service trended data.

(2) Other state and national dental program performance and quality measures.

(3) Other state and national performance
 ratings.

(d) On October 1, 2014, for the 2013 calendar year, and on or before October 1, 2016, for the 2015 calendar year, the list of performance measures established by the department along with the data of the dental fee-for-service program performance shall be posted on the department’s Internet Web site.

(e) Commencing January 31, 2017, for the 2015–16 fiscal year, and annually on or before January 31 for each preceding fiscal year thereafter, the list of performance measures established by the department along with the data of the dental fee-for-service program shall be posted on the department’s Internet Web site.

(f) Commencing April 30, 2017, for the July 2016 to September 2016, inclusive, fiscal quarter, and quarterly thereafter on or before April 30, July 31, October 31, and January 31 for the fiscal
 quarter ending seven months prior, the data of the dental fee-for-service program performance shall be posted on the department’s Internet Web site.

(g) The department may amend or remove performance measures and establish additional performance measures in accordance with all of the following:

(1) The department shall consider performance measures established by other states, the federal government, and national organizations developing dental program performance and quality measures.

(2) The department shall notify a fee-for-service contractor, at least 30 days prior to the implementation date, of any updates or changes to performance measures. The department shall also post these updates or changes on its Internet Web site at least 30 days prior to implementation in order to maintain transparency to the
 public.

(3) In establishing the performance measures, the department shall consult with stakeholders, including representatives from counties, local dental societies, nonprofit entities, legal aid entities, and other interested parties.

(h) The department shall annually prepare a summary report of the nature and types of complaints and grievances regarding access to, and quality of, dental services, including the outcome. Commencing January 31, 2017, for the prior fiscal year, and annually thereafter, for each preceding fiscal year, this report shall be posted on the department’s Internet Web site.

(i) The department shall ensure, to the greatest degree possible, that the categories of data and performance measures selected under this section are consistent with the categories of data and performance measures
 selected under Section 14459.6.

(j) No sooner than July 1, 2019, the department shall annually publish utilization data from the preceding calendar year and post this material on its Internet Web site. The utilization data shall be made publicly available for both the dental fee-for-service and dental managed care programs. The utilization data shall include all of the following information:

(1) Number of patients seen on a per-provider basis.

(2) Number of annual preventative dental services, dental treatment services, examinations, and oral health evaluations rendered by each provider during each calendar year.

(3) Number of beneficiaries who received general anesthesia services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.   (AB 2207)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.92.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 4512, or any other provision of this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), services provided on or after July 1, 2000, by facilities defined in subdivisions (e) and (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code that are otherwise covered services under this chapter shall be reimbursed by the Medi-Cal program when provided to a Medi-Cal beneficiary that has a developmental disability as defined in Section 6001(8) of Title 42 of the United States Code or is a person with a
 related condition as defined in Section 435.1009 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, provided that the Medi-Cal beneficiary was residing in a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative or a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing on July 1, 2000, but only for as long as the beneficiary continues, from that date, to reside in a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative or a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall eliminate, for purposes of reimbursement under this section, the requirements and time limits set forth in Section 14115, or any regulations adopted thereunder.

(c) The department shall seek further financial participation, and shall seek federal approval of a state plan amendment if necessary under
 Section 440.150 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, for services provided pursuant to subdivision (a). If federal financial participation is not made available for the services, the services nonetheless shall be reimbursed from the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 804, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.925.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, to the extent federal financial participation is available, in furtherance of Section 14105.06 and subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 14132.92, effective July 1, 2007, a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care
 facility/developmentally disabled shall be responsible for providing day treatment and transportation services consistent with Section 14105.06 and subdivision (a) of Section 14132.92, that are selected and authorized through the individual program plan process pursuant to Sections 4646 and 4646.5 and applicable regulations, for each beneficiary receiving those services who resides in that licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled.

(2) (A) The services described in paragraph (1) shall be arranged by the regional center pursuant to Sections 4646 and 4646.5 and applicable regulations.

(B) The licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care
 facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled shall reimburse the regional center for the full costs of making the disbursements to day treatment and transportation service providers.

(3) Nothing in this section shall authorize the licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled to substitute day treatment or transportation services not selected and authorized through the individual program plan process pursuant to Sections 4646 and 4646.5 and applicable regulations.

(b) (1) The State Department of Developmental Services shall be responsible for reimbursing a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed
 intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled for the costs of reimbursing the regional center for the full cost of making disbursements for day treatment and transportation services, plus a coordination fee which will include an administrative fee and reimbursement for increased costs associated with the quality assurance fee. This payment shall be a supplement to the Medi-Cal payment from the State Department of Health Care Services described in Sections 14105.06 and 14132.92.

(2) A licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled may authorize the regional center to invoice the State Department of Developmental Services on its behalf for the services described in subdivision (a).

(3) (A) The licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled shall reimburse the regional center for the full costs of making disbursements for day treatment and transportation services within 30 days of receipt of payment from the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to instructions from the State Department of Developmental Services.

(B) If there is a failure to reimburse the regional center within 30 days of receipt of payment from the State Department of Developmental Services, for all or part of the costs associated with disbursement for day treatment and transportation services, the outstanding amount shall be recovered by any of the following methods:

(i) Lump sum payment by the provider.

(ii) Offset against current payments due to the provider from the State of California.

(iii) A repayment agreement between the provider and the State of California.

(c) (1) A licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled shall report the costs incurred pursuant to subdivision (a) according to instructions from the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code, the department may implement this subdivision by means of a provider bulletin or similar instruction.

(d) (1) If the services meeting the conditions of subdivision (a) have been provided to a Medi-Cal beneficiary on or after July 1, 2007, and, notwithstanding Section 14115, a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled may authorize the regional center to invoice the State Department of Developmental Services on its behalf for arranging for the services described in subdivision (a). The licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled shall reimburse the regional center the full cost of making
 disbursements for day treatment and transportation services within 30 days of receipt of payment from the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to instruction from the State Department of Developmental Services. If a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled fails to reimburse the regional center within 30 days of receipt of payment from the State Department of Developmental Services, for all or part of the costs associated with the day treatment and transportation services, the outstanding amount shall be recovered by any of the following methods:

(A) Lump sum payment by the provider.

(B) Offset against current payments due to the provider from the State of California.

(C) A repayment agreement between the provider and the State of California.

(2) The department shall seek federal financial participation, including any moneys available pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), pursuant to a federally approved state plan amendment authorizing reimbursement for costs incurred pursuant to subdivision (a) for day treatment and transportation services provided on or after July 1, 2007.

(3) Upon approval of the state plan amendment, the reimbursement payments made pursuant to this section by the State Department of Developmental Services to a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled
 shall be subject to the quality assurance fee imposed upon designated intermediate care facilities pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 1324) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) If federal financial participation is not made available for day treatment and transportation services provided on or after July 1, 2007, the services nonetheless shall be reimbursed from the General Fund by the State Department of Developmental Services.

(e) The State Department of Health Care Services shall request approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the implementation of this section. The Director of Health Care Services, with the concurrence of the Director of Developmental Services, may alter the methodology specified in this section to the extent necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations or to obtain
 federal approval. If after seeking federal approval, federal approval is not obtained or federal financial participation is no longer available, this section and Section 4646.55 shall not be implemented or shall become inoperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 717, Sec. 157.   (SB 853)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (e).)
-------------------------------------------

14132.93.

It is the intent of the Legislature that if services meeting the conditions of subdivision (a) of Section 14132.92 have been provided to a Medi-Cal beneficiary during the time period of June 15, 1998, to July 2, 2000, and notwithstanding Section 14115, a bill for these services is submitted on behalf of each beneficiary receiving these services postmarked to the department on or before April 30, 2001, the services shall be reimbursed by the General Fund. However, the department shall seek federal financial participation and shall seek federal approval of a state
 plan amendment if necessary under Section 440.150 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, for these services provided during that period. If federal financial participation is not made available for that period, the services nonetheless shall be reimbursed from the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 804, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.94.

(a) Subject to approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of a medicaid state plan amendment electing the Programs of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) as a state medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 (commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall become a covered benefit of the Medi-Cal program, subject to utilization
 controls and eligibility criteria that require that the beneficiary be certifiable for nursing facility services based on Medi-Cal criteria.

(b) Covered services under the PACE benefit of the Medi-Cal program include those set forth in 42 C.F.R. 460.92.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 112, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.95.

(a) Personal care services, when provided to a categorically needy person as defined in Section 14050.1 is a covered benefit to the extent federal financial participation is available if these services are:

(1) Provided in the beneficiary’s home and other locations as may be authorized by the director subject to federal approval.

(2) Authorized by county social services staff in accordance with a plan of treatment.

(3) Provided by a qualified person.

(4) Provided to a beneficiary who has a chronic, disabling condition that
 causes functional impairment that is expected to last at least 12 consecutive months or that is expected to result in death within 12 months and who is unable to remain safely at home without the services described in this section.

(b) The department shall seek federal approval of a state plan amendment necessary to include personal care as a Medicaid service pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 440.170 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. For any persons who meet the criteria specified in subdivision (a) or (p), but for whom federal financial participation is not available for a service or services under this section, eligibility for the service or services shall be determined according to the waiver authorized pursuant to Section 14132.951. If federal financial participation for the service or services is not available under this section or Section 14132.951, eligibility for the service or services shall be determined pursuant to
 Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not be implemented unless the department has obtained federal approval of the state plan amendment described in subdivision (b), and the Department of Finance has determined, and has informed the department in writing, that the implementation of this section will not result in additional costs to the state relative to state appropriation for in-home supportive services under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, in the 1992–93 fiscal year.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, personal care services shall mean all of the following:

(A) Assistance with ambulation.

(B) Bathing, oral hygiene and grooming.

(C) Dressing.

(D) Care and assistance with prosthetic devices.

(E) Bowel, bladder, and menstrual care.

(F) Skin care.

(G) Repositioning, range of motion exercises, and transfers.

(H) Feeding and assurance of adequate fluid intake.

(I) Respiration.

(J) Paramedical services.

(K) Assistance with self-administration of medications.

(2) Ancillary services including meal
 preparation and cleanup, routine laundry, shopping for food and other necessities, and domestic services may also be provided as long as these ancillary services are subordinate to personal care services. Ancillary services may not be provided separately from the basic personal care services.

(e) (1) (A) After consulting with the State Department of Social Services, the department shall adopt emergency regulations to establish the amount, scope, and duration of personal care services available to persons described in subdivision (a) in the fiscal year whenever the department determines that General Fund expenditures for personal care services provided under this section and expenditures of both General Fund moneys and federal funds received under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act for services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, are expected to exceed the
 General Fund appropriation and the federal appropriation under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act provided for the 1992–93 fiscal year pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, as it read on June 30, 1992, as adjusted for caseload growth or as increased in the Budget Act or appropriated by statute. At least 30 days prior to filing these regulations with the Secretary of State, the department shall give notice of the expected content of these regulations to the fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature.

(B) In establishing the amount, scope, and duration of personal care services, the department shall ensure that General Fund expenditures for personal care services provided for under this section and expenditures of both General Fund moneys and federal funds received under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act for services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, do
 not exceed the General Fund appropriation and the federal appropriation under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act provided for the 1992–93 fiscal year pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, as it read on June 30, 1992, as adjusted for caseload growth or as increased in the Budget Act or appropriated by statute.

(C) For purposes of this subdivision, “caseload growth” means an adjustment factor determined by the department based on (1) growth in the number of persons eligible for benefits under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) on the basis of their disability, (2) the average increase in the number of hours in the program established pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 in the 1988–89 to 1992–93 fiscal years, inclusive, due to the level of impairment, and (3) any increase in program costs that is required by an increase in the mandatory minimum wage.

(2) In establishing the amount, scope, and duration of personal care services pursuant to this subdivision, the department may define and take into account, among other things:

(A) The extent to which the particular personal care services are essential or nonessential.

(B) Standards establishing the medical necessity of the services to be provided.

(C) Utilization controls.

(D) A minimum number of hours of personal care services that must first be assessed as needed as a condition of receiving personal care services pursuant to this section.

The level of personal care services shall be established so as to avoid, to the extent feasible within
 budgetary constraints, medical out-of-home placements.

(3) To the extent that General Fund expenditures for services provided under this section and expenditures of both General Fund moneys and federal funds received under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act for services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 in the 1992–93 fiscal year, adjusted for caseload growth, exceed General Fund expenditures for services provided under this section and expenditures of both General Fund moneys and federal funds received under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act for services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 in any fiscal year, the excess of these funds shall be expended for any purpose as directed in the Budget Act or as otherwise statutorily disbursed by the Legislature.

(f) Services pursuant to this section shall
 be rendered, under the administrative direction of the State Department of Social Services, in the manner authorized in Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, for the In-Home Supportive Services program. A provider of personal care services shall be qualified to provide the service and shall be a person other than a member of the family. For purposes of this section, a family member means a parent of a minor child or a spouse.

(g) The maximum number of hours available under the In-Home Supportive Services program pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, Section 14132.951, and this section, combined, shall be 283 hours per month.

(h) Personal care services shall not be provided to residents of facilities licensed by the department, and shall not be provided to residents of a community care facility or a residential care facility for the
 elderly licensed by the Community Care Licensing Division of the State Department of Social Services.

(i) Subject to any limitations that may be imposed pursuant to subdivision (e), determination of need and authorization for services shall be performed in accordance with Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3.

(j) (1) To the extent permitted by federal law, reimbursement rates for personal care services shall be equal to the rates in each county for the same mode of services in the In-Home Supportive Services program pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, plus any increase provided in the annual Budget Act for personal care services rates or included in a county budget pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) (A) The department shall
 establish a provider reimbursement rate methodology to determine payment rates for the individual provider mode of service that does all of the following:

(i) Is consistent with the functions and duties of entities created pursuant to Section 12301.6.

(ii) Makes any additional expenditure of state general funds subject to appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(iii) Permits county-only funds to draw down federal financial participation consistent with federal law.

(B) This ratesetting method shall be in effect in time for any rate increases to be included in the annual Budget Act.

(C) The department may, in establishing the ratesetting method required by subparagraph (A), do both of the
 following:

(i) Deem the market rate for like work in each county, as determined by the Employment Development Department, to be the cap for increases in payment rates for individual practitioner services.

(ii) Provide for consideration of county input concerning the rate necessary to ensure access to services in that county.
